Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 3
EMISSIONS INSPECTION

42-4-301. Legislative declarations - enactment of enhanced emissions program not waiver of state right to challenge authority to require specific loaded mode transient dynamometer technology in automobile emissions testing.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that sections 42-4-301 to 42-4-316 are enacted pursuant to, and that the program created by said sections is designed to meet, the requirements of the federal "Clean Air Act", as amended by the federal "Clean Air Act Amendments of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 7401 et seq., as the same is in effect on November 15, 1990.

The general assembly further finds and declares that:

The provisions of sections 42-4-301 to 42-4-316 related to the enhanced emissions program are enacted to comply with administrative requirements of rules and regulations of the federal environmental protection agency;

Insofar as such rules and regulations require the use of loaded mode transient dynamometer technology utilizing a system commonly known as the IM 240 in motor vehicle emissions testing, the general assembly finds that reliable scientific data questions the effectiveness of such technology to measure motor vehicle emissions at the high altitude of the Denver metropolitan area;

Less costly automobile emission testing systems may be available which are as effective or more effective at a lower cost to consumers than the loaded mode transient dynamometer test required by the federal environmental protection agency.

The general assembly, therefore, declares that the enactment of sections 42-4-301 to 42-4-316 in no way forecloses or limits the rights of the general assembly or any other appropriate entity of the state of Colorado to retain legal counsel as provided by law to request the federal environmental protection agency to consider alternative automobile emission inspection technology which may relieve Colorado of the requirements of the federal rules and regulations or change such rules and regulations to require a different technology in automobile emissions testing at a substantial savings in cost to consumers and jobs for Coloradans employed in the testing of motor vehicles for emissions compliance.

If the federal agency refuses to alter its policies related to this issue, the general assembly hereby declares that it or any other appropriate entity of the state of Colorado does not waive the right to bring appropriate legal action in a court of competent jurisdiction to determine the validity of the federal environmental protection agency's authority to require the use of the loaded mode transient dynamometer test for automobile emissions inspection commonly known as the IM 240 when such requirement may be in excess of the federal agency's authority under the federal "Clean Air Act Amendments of 1990".

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2272, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-306.5 as it existed prior to 1994.

Cross references:

For the "Colorado Air Pollution Prevention and Control Act", see article 7 of title 25.

42-4-302. Commencement of basic emissions program - authority of commission.

Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 42-4-301 to 42-4-316, if the commission is unable to implement the basic emissions program by January 1, 1994, the commission by rule and regulation shall establish the date for the commencement of said program as soon as practicable after January 1, 1994, and the provisions of sections 42-4-301 to 42-4-316 applicable to the basic emissions program shall be effective on and after the date determined by the commission by rule and regulation. Until such date, emission inspection activity in El Paso, Larimer, and Weld counties shall comply with the requirements applicable to inspection and readjustment stations in sections 42-4-301 to 42-4-316, and El Paso, Larimer, and Weld counties shall be deemed to continue to be included in the inspection and readjustment program until implementation of the basic emissions program by the commission pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2273, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-306.6 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-303. Sunrise review of registration of repair facilities. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2273, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

Subsection (3) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1996. (See

L. 94, p. 2273

.)

42-4-304. Definitions relating to motor vehicle inspection and readjustment program.

As used in sections 42-4-301 to 42-4-316, unless the context otherwise requires:

"AIR program" or "program" means the automobile inspection and readjustment program until replaced as provided in sections 42-4-301 to 42-4-316, the basic emissions program, and the enhanced emissions program established pursuant to sections 42-4-301 to 42-4-316.

"Basic emissions program" means the inspection and readjustment program, established pursuant to the federal act, in the counties set forth in paragraph (b) of subsection (20) of this section.

"Certification of emissions control" means one of the following certifications, to be issued to the owner of a motor vehicle which is subject to the automobile inspection and readjustment program to indicate the status of inspection requirement compliance of said vehicle:

"Certification of emissions waiver", indicating that the emissions of other than chlorofluorocarbons from the vehicle do not comply with the applicable emissions standards and criteria after inspection, adjustment, and emissions-related repairs in accordance with section 42-4-310.

"Certification of emissions compliance", indicating that the emissions from said vehicle comply with applicable emissions and opacity standards and criteria at the time of inspection or after required adjustments or repairs.

The certification of emissions control will be issued to the vehicle owner at the time of sale or transfer except as provided in section 42-4-310 (1)(a)(I). The certification of emissions control will be in effect for twenty-four months for 1982 and newer model vehicles. 1981 and older model vehicles and all vehicles inspected by the fleet-only air inspection stations shall be issued certifications of emissions control valid for twelve months.

Except as provided in section 42-4-309, the executive director shall establish a biennial inspection schedule for 1982 and newer model vehicles, an annual inspection schedule for 1981 and older model vehicles, and a five-year inspection schedule for a 1976 or newer motor vehicle registered as a collector's item.

Repealed.

Subject to section 42-4-310 (4), the certification of emissions control shall be obtained by the seller and transferred to the new owner at the time of vehicle sale or transfer.

For purposes of this subsection (3), "sale or transfer" shall not include a change only in the legal ownership as shown on the vehicle's documents of title, whether for purposes of refinancing or otherwise, that does not entail a change in the physical possession or use of the vehicle.

(3.5) "Clean screen program" means the remote sensing system or other emission profiling system established and operated pursuant to sections 42-4-305 (12), 42-4-306 (23), 42-4-307 (10.5), and 42-4-310 (5).

"Commission" means the air quality control commission, created in section 25-7-104, C.R.S.

"Contractor" means any person, partnership, entity, or corporation that is awarded a contract by the state of Colorado through a competitive bid process conducted by the division in consultation with the executive director and in accordance with the "Procurement Code", articles 101 to 112 of title 24, C.R.S., and section 42-4-306, to provide inspection services for vehicles required to be inspected pursuant to section 42-4-310 within the enhanced program area, as set forth in subsection (9) of this section, to operate enhanced inspection centers necessary to perform inspections, and to operate the clean screen program within the program area.

"Division" means the division of administration in the department of public health and environment.

"Emissions inspector" means:

An individual trained and licensed in accordance with section 42-4-308 to inspect motor vehicles at an inspection-only facility, fleet inspection station, or motor vehicle dealer test facility subject to the enhanced emissions program set forth in this part 3; or

An individual employed by an enhanced inspection center who is authorized by the contractor to inspect motor vehicles subject to the enhanced emissions program set forth in this part 3 and subject to the direction of said contractor.

"Emissions mechanic" means an individual licensed in accordance with section 42-4-308 to inspect and adjust motor vehicles subject to the automobile inspection and readjustment program until such program is replaced as provided in sections 42-4-301 to 42-4-316 and to the basic emissions program after such replacement.

(8.5) "Enhanced emissions inspection" means a motor vehicle emissions inspection conducted pursuant to the enhanced emissions program, including a detection of high emissions by remote sensing, an identification of high emitters, a clean screen inspection, or an inspection conducted at an enhanced inspection center.

"Enhanced emissions program" means the emissions inspection program established pursuant to the federal requirements set forth in the federal performance standards, 40 CFR, part 51, subpart S, in the locations set forth in paragraph (c) of subsection (20) of this section.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-003), ch. 322, p. 1714, § 1, effective June 1, 2009.)

"Enhanced inspection center" means a strategically located, single- or multi-lane, high-volume, inspection-only facility operated in the enhanced emissions program area by a contractor not affiliated with any other automotive-related service, which meets the requirements of sections 42-4-305 and 42-4-306, which is equipped to enable vehicle exhaust gas and evaporative and chlorofluorocarbon emissions inspections, and which the owner or operator is authorized to operate by the executive director as an inspection-only facility.

"Environmental protection agency" means the federal environmental protection agency.

"Executive director" means the executive director of the department of revenue or the designee of such executive director.

"Federal act" means the federal "Clean Air Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 7401 et seq., as in effect on November 15, 1990, and any federal regulation promulgated pursuant to said act.

"Federal requirements" means regulations of the environmental protection agency pursuant to the federal act.

"Fleet inspection station" means a facility which meets the requirements of section 42-4-308, which is equipped to enable appropriate emissions inspections as prescribed by the commission and which the owner or operator is licensed to operate by the executive director as an inspection station for purposes of emissions testing on vehicles pursuant to section 42-4-309.

(15.5) Repealed.

"Inspection and readjustment station" means:

Repealed.

A facility within the basic emissions program area as defined in subsection (20) of this section which meets the requirements of section 42-4-308, which is equipped to enable vehicle exhaust, evaporative, and chlorofluorocarbon emissions inspections and any necessary adjustments and repairs to be performed, and which facility the owner or operator is licensed by the executive director to operate as an inspection and readjustment station.

This paragraph (b) is effective January 1, 1994.

"Inspection-only facility" means a facility operated by an independent owner-operator within the enhanced program area as defined in subsection (20) of this section which meets the requirements of section 42-4-308 and which is equipped to enable vehicle exhaust, evaporative, and chlorofluorocarbon emissions inspections and which facility the operator is licensed to operate by the executive director as an inspection-only facility. Such inspection-only facility shall be authorized to conduct inspections on model year 1981 and older vehicles.

This subsection (17) is effective January 1, 1995.

"Motor vehicle", as applicable to the AIR program, includes only a motor vehicle that is operated with four wheels or more on the ground, self-propelled by a spark-ignited engine burning gasoline, gasoline blends, gaseous fuel, blends of liquid gasoline and gaseous fuels, alcohol, alcohol blends, or other similar fuels, having a personal property classification of A, B, or C pursuant to section 42-3-106, and for which registration in this state is required for operation on the public roads and highways or which motor vehicle is owned or operated or both by a nonresident who meets the requirements set forth in section 42-4-310 (1)(c). "Motor vehicle" does not include kit vehicles; vehicles registered pursuant to section 42-12-301 or 42-3-306 (4); vehicles registered pursuant to section 42-12-401 that are of model year 1975 or earlier or that have two-stroke cycle engines manufactured prior to 1980; or vehicles registered as street-rods pursuant to section 42-3-201.

"Motor vehicle dealer test facility" means a stationary or mobile facility which is operated by a state trade association for motor vehicle dealers which is licensed to operate by the executive director as a motor vehicle dealer test facility to conduct emissions inspections.

Inspections conducted pursuant to section 42-4-309 (3) by a motor vehicle dealer test facility shall only be conducted on used motor vehicles inventoried or consigned in this state for retail sale by a motor vehicle dealer that is licensed pursuant to part 1 of article 20 of title 44 and that is a member of the state trade association operating the motor vehicle dealer test facility.

Inspection procedures used by a motor vehicle dealer test facility pursuant to this paragraph (b) shall include a loaded mode transient dynamometer test cycle in combination with appropriate idle short tests pursuant to rules and regulations of the commission.

That portion of El Paso county that is east of the following boundary, defined on a south-to-north axis: From the El Paso-Pueblo county line north (upstream) along Chico creek (Ranges 63 and 64 West, Township 17 South) to Hanover road, then east along Hanover road (El Paso county route 422) to Peyton highway, then north along Peyton highway (El Paso county route 463) to Falcon highway, then west on Falcon highway (El Paso county route 405) to Peyton highway, then north on Peyton highway (El Paso county route 405) to Judge Orr road, then west on Judge Orr road (El Paso county route 108) to Elbert road, then north on Elbert road (El Paso county route 91) to the El Paso-Elbert county line;

That portion of Larimer county that is west of the boundary defined on a north-to-south axis by Range seventy-one west and north of the boundary defined on an east-to-west axis by township five north, that portion that is west of the boundary defined on a north-to-south axis by range seventy-three west, and that portion that is north of the boundary latitudinal line 40 degrees, 42 minutes, 47.1 seconds north;

That portion of Weld county that is north of the boundary defined on an east-to-west axis by Weld county road 78; that portion that is east of the boundary defined on a north-to-south axis by Weld county road 43 and north of the boundary defined on an east-to-west axis by Weld county road 62; that portion that is east of the boundary defined on a north-to-south axis by Weld county road 49, south of the boundary defined on an east-to-west axis by Weld county road 62 and north of the boundary defined on an east-to-west axis by Weld county road 46; that portion that is east of the boundary defined on a north-to-south axis by Weld county road 27, south of the boundary defined on an east-to-west axis by Weld county road 46 and north of the boundary defined on an east-to-west axis by Weld county road 36; that portion that is east of the boundary defined on a north-to-south axis by Weld county road 19, south of the boundary defined on an east-to-west axis by Weld county road 36 and north of the boundary defined on an east-to-west axis by Weld county road 20; and that portion that is east of the boundary defined on a north-to-south axis by Weld county road 39 and south of the boundary defined on an east-to-west axis by Weld county road 20.

"Program area" means the counties of Adams, Arapahoe, Boulder, Douglas, El Paso, Jefferson, Larimer, and Weld, and the cities and counties of Broomfield and Denver, excluding the following areas and subject to paragraph (d) of this subsection (20):

(I) That portion of Adams county that is east of Kiowa creek (Range sixty-two west, townships one, two, and three south) between the Adams-Arapahoe county line and the Adams-Weld county line;

(II) That portion of Arapahoe county that is east of Kiowa creek (Range sixty-two west, townships four and five south) between the Arapahoe-Elbert county line and the Arapahoe-Adams county line;

Effective January 1, 2010, the basic emissions program area shall consist of the county of El Paso, as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (20).

Effective January 1, 2010, the enhanced emissions program area shall consist of the counties of Adams, Arapahoe, Boulder, Douglas, Jefferson, Larimer, and Weld, and the cities and counties of Broomfield and Denver as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection (20) and subject to paragraph (d) of this subsection (20). Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, vehicles registered in the counties of Larimer and Weld shall not be required to obtain a certificate of emissions control prior to July 1, 2010, in order to be registered or reregistered.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 2003, p. 1357

, 1, effective August 6, 2003.)

Only those counties included in the basic emissions program area pursuant to paragraph (b) of this subsection (20) that violate national ambient air quality standards for carbon monoxide or ozone as established by the environmental protection agency may, on a case-by-case basis, be incorporated into the enhanced emissions program by final order of the commission.

The commission shall review the boundaries of the program area and may, by rule promulgated on or before December 31, 2011, adjust such boundaries to exclude particularly identified regions from either the basic program area, the enhanced area, or both, based on an analysis of the applicable air quality science and the effects of the program on the population living in such regions.

"Registered repair facility or technician" means an automotive repair business which has registered with the division, agrees to have its emissions-related cost effectiveness monitored based on inspection data, and is periodically provided performance statistics for the purpose of improving emissions-related repairs. Specific repair effectiveness information shall subsequently be provided to motorists at the time of inspection failure.

"State implementation plan" or "SIP" means the plan required by and described in section 110 (a) of the federal act.

"Technical center" means any facility operated by the division or its designee to support AIR program activities including but not limited to licensed emissions inspectors or emissions mechanics, motorists, repair technicians, or small business technical assistance.

(23.5) "Vehicle" means a motor vehicle as defined in subsection (18) of this section.

"Verification of emissions test" means a certificate to be attached to a motor vehicle's windshield verifying that the vehicle has been issued a valid certification of emissions control.

Source:

L. 94:

(17) amended, p. 1647, § 84, effective May 31; (6) amended, p. 2809, § 582, effective July 1; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2274, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(5) and (9) amended, p. 953, § 8, effective May 25.

L. 96:

(18) amended, p. 441, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(3)(d) amended, p. 230, § 1, effective April 10; (3.5) added, p. 891, § 1, effective May 26.

L. 2001:

(5) amended and (8.5) added, p. 1013, § 2, effective June 5.

L. 2003:

(3)(e) added, p. 1589, § 6, effective May 2; (3)(b)(I) amended, p. 1602, § 1, effective August 6; (3)(d) amended, p. 2186, § 1, effective August 6; IP(20)(a), (20)(c)(I), and (20)(c)(II) amended and (20)(d) added, p. 1357, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

(3)(b)(I) and (18) amended, p. 1173, § 11, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(15.5) and (23.5) added, p. 1025, § 2, effective July 1; (18) amended, p. 1411, § 2, effective July 1, 2007.

L. 2009:

(2), (3)(c), (9), (18), and (20) amended, (SB 09-003), ch. 322, p. 1714, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(18) amended, (SB 10-212), ch. 412, p. 2038, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2011:

(3)(c) repealed and (18) amended, (SB 11-031), ch. 86, p. 245, §§ 8, 9, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(15.5) repealed, (SB 12-034), ch. 107, p. 363, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2013:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1709, § 138, effective August 7; (3)(b)(II) amended, (HB 13-1071), ch. 370, p. 2161, § 3, effective August 7.

L. 2017:

(19)(b)(I) amended, (SB 17-240), ch. 395, p. 2065, § 51, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(19)(b)(I) amended, (SB 18-030), ch. 7, p. 141, § 17, effective October 1.

42-4-305. Powers and duties of executive director - automobile inspection and readjustment program - basic emissions program - enhanced emissions program - clean screen program - rules.

The executive director is authorized to issue, deny, cancel, suspend, or revoke licenses for, and shall furnish instructions to, inspection and readjustment stations, inspection-only facilities, fleet inspection stations, motor vehicle dealer test facilities, and enhanced inspection centers. The executive director shall provide all necessary forms for inspection and readjustment stations, inspection-only facilities, and fleet inspection stations. Motor vehicle dealer test facilities and enhanced inspection centers shall purchase necessary inspection forms from the vendor or vendors identified by the executive director. Said inspection and readjustment stations, inspection-only facilities, fleet inspection stations, motor vehicle dealer test facilities, and enhanced inspection centers shall be responsible for the issuance of certifications of emissions control. The executive director is authorized to furnish forms and instructions and issue or deny licenses to, or cancel, suspend, or revoke licenses of, emissions inspectors and emissions mechanics. The initial biennial fee for an inspection and readjustment station license, an inspection-only facility license, a fleet inspection station license, a motor vehicle dealer test facility license, and an enhanced inspection center authorization shall be thirty-five dollars, and the biennial renewal fee shall be twenty dollars. The initial biennial fee for issuance of an emissions inspector license or an emissions mechanic license shall be fifteen dollars, and the biennial renewal fee shall be ten dollars. The fee for each transfer of an emissions inspector license or an emissions mechanic license shall be ten dollars. The moneys received from such fees shall be deposited to the credit of the AIR account in the highway users tax fund, and such moneys shall be expended by the department of revenue only for the administration of the inspection and readjustment program upon appropriation by the general assembly.

Notwithstanding the amount specified for any fee in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1), the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of one or more of the fees if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of one or more of the fees as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

The executive director shall supervise the activities of licensed inspection and readjustment stations, inspection-only facilities, fleet inspection stations, motor vehicle dealer test facilities, authorized enhanced inspection centers, licensed emissions inspectors, and licensed emissions mechanics and shall cause inspections to be made of such stations, facilities, centers, inspectors, and mechanics and appropriate records for compliance with licensing requirements.

The executive director shall require the surrender of any license issued under section 42-4-308 upon cancellation, suspension, or revocation action taken for a violation of any of the provisions of sections 42-4-301 to 42-4-316 or of any of the regulations promulgated pursuant thereto. In any such actions affecting licenses, the executive director may conduct hearings as a result of which such action is to be taken. Any such hearing may be conducted by a hearing officer appointed at the request of the executive director in accordance with the "State Administrative Procedure Act", article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., which shall govern the conduct of such hearings and action on said licenses, except as provided in section 42-4-312 (4).

The executive director shall promulgate rules and regulations consistent with those of the commission for the administration and operation of inspection and readjustment stations, inspection-only facilities, fleet inspection stations, motor vehicle dealer test facilities, and enhanced inspection centers and for the issuance, identification, and use of certifications of emissions control and shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to the effectiveness of the automobile inspection and readjustment program.

The executive director shall promulgate rules and regulations which require that each licensed inspection and readjustment station, inspection-only facility, or enhanced inspection center post in a clearly legible fashion in a conspicuous place in such station, facility, or center the fee charged by such station, facility, or center for performing an emissions inspection and, within the basic program area, the fee charged by any such inspection and readjustment station for performing the adjustments and any repairs required for the issuance of a certification of emissions waiver.

The executive director shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may be necessary to implement an ongoing quality assurance program to discover, correct, and prevent fraud, waste, and abuse and to determine whether proper procedures are being followed, whether the emissions test equipment is calibrated as specified, and whether other problems exist which would impede the success of the program.

The department shall conduct overt performance audits as follows:

At least twice per year at each inspection and readjustment station, inspection-only facility, and motor vehicle dealer test facility;

At least twice per year at each fleet inspection station;

At least twice per year for each test lane at each enhanced inspection center.

In addition to regularly scheduled overt performance audits, the department may perform additional risk-based overt performance audits for stations and facilities employing inspectors or mechanics suspected of violating rules as a result of an audit, data analysis, or consumer complaint.

The department shall conduct covert audits using unmarked motor vehicles at least once per year per number of inspectors at each inspection-only facility and enhanced inspection center;

In addition to regularly scheduled covert audits, the department may perform additional risk-based covert audits for stations and facilities employing inspectors or mechanics suspected of violating rules as a result of an audit, data analysis, or consumer complaint.

Record audits to review the performance of inspection-only facilities, motor vehicle dealer test facilities, and enhanced inspection centers, including compliance with record-keeping and reporting requirements, shall be performed on a monthly basis.

The department shall perform equipment audits to verify quality control and calibration of the required test equipment as follows:

At least twice per year at each inspection and readjustment station;

At least twice per year on each test lane at each inspection-only facility, motor vehicle dealer test facility, and enhanced inspection center, to be performed contemporaneously with the overt performance audit;

At least twice per year at each fleet inspection station.

In addition to regularly scheduled equipment audits, the department may perform additional risk-based equipment audits for stations and facilities employing inspectors or mechanics suspected of violating rules as a result of an audit, data analysis, or consumer complaint.

The executive director shall transfer quality assurance activity results to the department of public health and environment at least quarterly.

The executive director shall implement and enforce the emissions test requirements as prescribed in section 42-4-310 by utilizing a registration denial-based enforcement program as required in the federal act including an electronic data transfer of inspection data through the use of a computer modem or similar technology for vehicle registration and program enforcement purposes. All inspection data generated at licensed inspection and readjustment stations, inspection-only facilities, fleet inspection stations, motor vehicle dealer test facilities, and enhanced inspection centers shall be provided to the department of public health and environment on a timely basis.

The executive director shall, by regulation, establish a method for the owners of motor vehicles which are exempt pursuant to section 42-4-304 (20) from the AIR program to establish their entitlement to such exemption. No additional fee or charge for establishing entitlement to such exemption shall be collected by the department.

The executive director shall be responsible for the issuance of certifications of emissions waiver as prescribed by section 42-4-310 and shall be responsible for the resolution of all formal public complaints concerning test results or test requirements in the most convenient and cost-effective manner possible.

The executive director and the department of public health and environment are authorized to enter into a contract or service agreement with a contractor to provide inspection services at enhanced inspection centers for vehicles within the enhanced program area required to be inspected pursuant to section 42-4-310. Any such contract or service agreement shall include such terms and conditions as are necessary to ensure that the contractor shall operate enhanced inspection centers in accordance with the requirements of this article and the federal act, shall include provisions establishing liquidated damages and penalties for failure to comply with the terms and conditions of the contract, and shall be in accordance with regulations adopted by the commission and the department of revenue. Any such contract or service agreement shall include provisions specifying that inspection and readjustment stations, inspection-only facilities, fleet inspection stations, and motor vehicle dealer test facilities shall have complete access to electronic data transfer of inspection data through computer services of the contractor at a cost equal to that of enhanced inspection centers.

Upon the approval of the executive director and the department of public health and environment, the contractor shall provide inspection services for vehicles within the enhanced program area required to be inspected pursuant to section 42-4-310.

Repealed.

The executive director shall promulgate rules, consistent with those of the commission, as necessary for implementation, enforcement, and quality assurance and for procedures and policies that allow data collected from the clean screen program to be matched with vehicle ownership information and for the information to be transferred to authorized agents. The rules must set forth the procedures for the executive director to inform authorized agents of the emission inspection status of vehicles up for registration renewal.

Source:

L. 94:

(6)(f), (7), and (10) amended, p. 2809, § 583, effective July 1, 1994; entire title amended with relocations, p. 2280, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 98:

(12) added, p. 891, § 2, effective May 26; (1) amended, p. 1358, § 112, effective June 1.

L. 2002:

(11) amended, p. 870, § 4, effective August 7.

L. 2012:

(6)(b), (6)(c), and (6)(e) amended, (SB 12-012), ch. 164, p. 574, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2017:

(11) repealed, (HB 17-1137), ch. 45, p. 136, § 9, effective August 9; (12) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 371, § 20, effective August 9.